Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; COMMUNITY FESTIVAL GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $1,250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for grants to community-based organizations, cities, and counties to support cultural festivals and events throughout the state of Minnesota. The funding may support event programming, staffing, community outreach, transportation, facilities and equipment rentals, and signage. Up to $200,000 of this amount may be set aside for public safety expense reimbursement to county sheriff departments to support the festivals and events. The Minnesota Humanities Center must give priority funding to the Somali Museum Annual Celebration, Twin Cities Jazz Fest, Selby Avenue Jazz Fest, the Hmong Festival, Cinco de Mayo festival, and Rondo Days in St. Paul; the Hiddo Soor International Somali Cultural Festival in Plymouth; and Safe Summer Nights and Somali Independence Day in St. Paul. new text end